Utah statutes.
75-5b-102.   Definitions.
In this chapter:
(1)  "Adult" means an individual who has attained 18 years of age.
(2)  "Conservator" means a person appointed by the court to administer the
property of an adult, including a person appointed under Title 75, Chapter 5,
Part 4, Protection of Property of Persons Under Disability and Minors.
(3)  "Emergency" means circumstances that likely will result in substantial
harm to a respondent's health, safety, or welfare, and in which the
appointment of a guardian is necessary because no other person has authority
to and is willing to act on the respondent's behalf.
(4)  "Guardian" means a person appointed by the court to make decisions
regarding the person of an adult, including a person appointed under Title 75,
Chapter 5, Part 3, Guardians of Incapacitated Persons.
(5)  "Guardianship order" means an order appointing a guardian.
(6)  "Guardianship proceeding" means a proceeding in which an order for the
appointment of a guardian is sought or has been issued.
(7)  "Home state" means the state in which the respondent was physically
present for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of a
petition for the appointment of a guardian or protective order.  A period of
temporary absence counts as part of the six-month period.
(8)  "Incapacitated person" means an adult for whom a guardian has been
appointed.
(9)  "Party" means the respondent, petitioner, guardian, conservator, or any
other person allowed by the court to participate in a guardianship or
protective proceeding.
(10)  "Person," except in the terms "incapacitated person" or "protected
person," means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government
or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, public corporation, or
any other legal or commercial entity.
(11)  "Protected person" means an adult for whom a protective order has been
made.
(12)  "Protective order" means an order appointing a conservator or another
court order related to management of an adult's property.
(13)  "Protective proceeding" means a judicial proceeding in which a
protective order is sought or has been issued.
(14)  "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or
that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in
perceivable form.
(15)  "Respondent" means an adult for whom a protective order or the
appointment of a guardian is sought.
(16)  "Significant-connection state" means a state, other than the home state,
with which a respondent has a significant connection other than mere physical
presence and in which substantial evidence concerning the respondent is
available.
(17)  "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian
tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of
the United States.
